Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,147.12
Preemption of local law.

The Nebraska
Seed Law and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder
shall supersede and preempt any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution
enacted by any political subdivision of the state regarding the regulation
of seeds. No political subdivision shall prohibit or in any other manner regulate
any matter relating to the registration, labeling, or sale of seeds based
upon the type, nature, or genetic makeup of such seeds. No political subdivision
shall prohibit or in any other manner regulate any matter relating to the
registration, labeling, sale, storage, transportation, distribution, notification
of use, planting, or cultivation of seeds that is in addition to or in conflict
with the Nebraska Seed Law and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
thereunder. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or otherwise
limit the authority of any city or county to adopt and enforce zoning regulations.

Laws 2009, LB263, § 1.